Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 17
CASE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR LONG-TERM
SERVICES AND SUPPORTS

25.5-6-1701. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that there is a need to ensure a high-performing statewide case management system exists that serves all populations of people who qualify for long-term services and supports. The case management system includes, but is not limited to, intake and eligibility screening and determination, outreach, and other administrative activities and case management services. The five key outcomes of the statewide case management system must include federal compliance, quality, simplicity, stability, and accountability.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 313, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1702. Definitions.

As used in this part 17, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authorized representative" means a person designated by the member receiving services, or by the parent or guardian of the member receiving services, if appropriate, to assist the member in acquiring or utilizing long-term services and supports pursuant to this article 6 and article 10 of this title 25.5. The extent of the authorized representative's involvement must be determined upon designation.

"Case management agency" means a public or private not-for-profit or for-profit organization contracted with the state of Colorado to provide case management services and activities.

"Case management services" means the assessment of an individual's need for long-term services and supports; the development and implementation of a person-centered support plan for the member; the coordination, monitoring, and delivery of long-term services and supports; the evaluation of service effectiveness; and the reassessment of the member's needs, all of which must be performed by a case management agency or an entity.

"Case manager" means a person who provides case management services and activities pursuant to this article 6 and article 10 of this title 25.5 for members receiving long-term services and supports.

"Community-centered board" means a private for-profit or not-for-profit organization that is an administrator of locally generated funding pursuant to section 25.5-10-206 (6) and acts as a resource for persons with an intellectual and developmental disability or a child with a developmental delay.

"Conflict-free case management" means case management services and activities provided to a member enrolled in a home- and community-based services waiver by an entity other than the entity providing direct long-term services and supports, except as otherwise allowed pursuant to 42 CFR 441.301 (c)(1)(vi). Service providers, case management agencies, and entities are responsible for ensuring employees meet the requirements of this article 6.

"Defined service area" means the geographical area determined by the state department to be served by a case management agency.

"Entity" means a public or private not-for-profit or for-profit organization, which may include a community-centered board, that has a contract or agreement with the state of Colorado to perform specific functions.

"Intellectual and developmental disability" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-403 (3.3)(a).

"Long-term services and supports" means the services and supports used by members of all ages with functional limitations and chronic illnesses who need assistance to perform routine daily activities.

"Member" means any person enrolled in the state medical assistance program, articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5, or the children's basic health plan, article 8 of this title 25.5.

"Person-centered support plan" means a long-term services and supports plan that is directed by the member, or the member's legal guardian, and prepared by the case manager to identify the supports needed for the member to achieve personally identified goals and is based on respecting and valuing member preferences, strengths, and contributions.

"Person with an intellectual and developmental disability" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-403 (3.3)(b).

"Service provider" means an agency or individual certified by the state department and enrolled to provide one or more long-term services and supports.

"Waiting list" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202 (38).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 313, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1703. Case management system - defined service areas - case management services - only willing and qualified provider exemption - rules.

No later than July 1, 2024, the state board shall adopt rules providing for the establishment of a case management system that consists of case management agencies throughout the state for the purpose of enabling individuals in need of long-term care to access appropriate long-term services and supports. Members in need of specialized assistance may be referred to other services outside of long-term services and supports, as necessary for additional care coordination.

No later than December 31, 2021, the state department shall work with stakeholders to develop a timeline for the implementation of this part 17.

No later than December 31, 2022, the state department shall issue a competitive solicitation in order to select case management agencies pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The competitive solicitation must include a reimbursement structure developed through a fiscal analysis.

No later than January 31, 2023, the state department shall provide an update on the status of the implementation of this part 17 to the joint budget committee of the general assembly as part of its annual presentation to that committee.

The state department shall utilize a stakeholder process to identify defined service areas for case management agencies across the state.

A case management agency may provide case management services to private paying individuals on a fee-for-service basis and shall provide case management services to members of publicly funded long-term services and supports programs, including but not limited to programs created pursuant to this article 6 and article 10 of this title 25.5.

Where applicable, the state department is authorized to seek a federal exemption from conflict-free case management requirements for defined service areas within the state where the only willing and qualified entity to provide case management services is also the only willing and qualified entity to provide home- and community-based services in that defined service area.

The state board shall utilize a stakeholder process when promulgating rules to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 315, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1704. Intellectual and developmental disability determination - functional eligibility determination - rules.

Intellectual and developmental disability determination. Any person may request an evaluation to determine whether the person has a developmental delay or an intellectual and developmental disability and is eligible to receive long-term services and supports pursuant to this article 6 and article 10 of this title 25.5. The person must request a developmental delay determination or intellectual and developmental disabilities determination from the case management agency or the entity in the defined service area where the person resides.

Functional eligibility determination. Pursuant to the contract with the state department, a case management agency shall determine whether a person is eligible to receive long-term services and supports pursuant to this article 6 and article 10 of this title 25.5. A case management agency or an entity shall develop a person-centered support plan for persons eligible for long-term services and supports for home- and community-based services and state general-funded programs.

The state board shall promulgate rules pursuant to article 4 of title 24 setting forth the procedure and criteria for determination of eligibility and person-centered support plan development. The procedure and criteria must be uniform in nature and applied throughout the state in a consistent manner.

Subject to available appropriations pursuant to section 25.5-10-206 and to the capacity of a service provider, the person must be provided options for long-term services and supports within the defined service area that can appropriately meet the person's identified needs, pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 316, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1705. Person-centered support plan.

Each member receiving services shall have a person-centered support plan, or a similar plan specified by the state department, developed and managed by a case management agency or an entity, and subject to review and approval pursuant to section 25.5-6-404. The person-centered support plan shall:

Be based on the particular service needs of the member receiving services;

Describe the services necessary to avoid institutionalization;

Ensure the member receives services in the setting of the member's choice; and

Identify the supports needed for the member to achieve personally identified goals.

Pursuant to this section, the person-centered support plan for each member receiving services must be reviewed at least annually and modified as necessary or appropriate.

A person-centered support plan is not required for a person with an intellectual and developmental disability or a developmental delay who is eligible for long-term services and supports and who is on a waiting list for enrollment into a program funded pursuant to article 10 of this title 25.5. Each case management agency shall provide information and referral services to each member on the waiting list for enrollment in a program at the time of the member's eligibility and annually thereafter, regarding long-term services and supports that are relevant to persons and are commonly used by persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and a developmental delay as provided by rules promulgated by the state board. The criteria for information and referral must be uniform in nature and applied throughout the state in a consistent manner.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 316, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1706. Termination of long-term services and supports for member receiving services.

A member receiving long-term services and supports pursuant to this article 6 or article 10 of this title 25.5 must be terminated from long-term services and supports upon a determination, made pursuant to the person-centered support planning process, that the long-term services and supports are no longer necessary. Prior to the effective date of the termination, notification of termination must be given to the member receiving services, the parents or guardian of a minor receiving services, and the person's legal guardian or other legal representative when applicable. A member terminated from services pursuant to this subsection (1) has a right to challenge the termination in accordance with state department rules.

When a member receiving services notifies the case management agency that the member no longer wishes to receive long-term services and supports, the member must be terminated from long-term services and supports unless the member is subject to a petition to impose a legal disability or to remove a legal right, filed pursuant to section 25.5-10-216, or the member has a legal guardian or other legal representative appointed affecting the member's ability to voluntarily terminate long-term services and supports. The parents of a minor who is receiving long-term services and supports and the minor's guardian must be notified of the minor's wish to terminate long-term services and supports, but no minor's long-term services and supports will be terminated without the consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 317, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1707. Records and confidentiality of information.

A record for each member receiving services must be diligently maintained by the case management agency or the entity. The record must include, but not be limited to, information pertaining to the determination of eligibility for services and the person-centered support plan. The record is not a public record for purposes of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all information obtained and any records prepared in the course of determining eligibility or providing long-term services and supports pursuant to this article 6 or article 10 of this title 25.5 are confidential and subject to the evidentiary privileges established by law. The disclosure of this information and these records in any manner is permitted only:

To the applicant or member receiving services, to the parents of a minor receiving services, to the member's legal guardian, or to any person authorized by the member receiving services;

In communications between qualified professional personnel, including the board of directors or governing body of the case management agency and service agencies providing services to the member, to the extent necessary for the acquisition, provision, oversight, or referral of long-term services and supports;

To the extent necessary to make claims for aid, insurance, or medical assistance to which a member receiving services may be entitled, or to access long-term services and supports pursuant to the person-centered support plan;

For the purposes of evaluation, gathering statistics, or research when no identifying information concerning a person or family is disclosed. Identifying information is information which could reasonably be expected to identify a specific person and includes, but is not limited to, name, address, telephone number, social security number, medicaid number, household number, and photograph.

To the court when necessary to implement the provisions of this article 6 or article 10 of this title 25.5;

To persons authorized by a court order issued after a hearing, notice of which was given to the member, parents or legal guardian, where appropriate, and the custodian of the information;

To safeguard the health and safety of an at-risk member by coordinating appropriate services and medical supports;

To the agency designated pursuant to 45 CFR 1326.20 as the protection and advocacy system for Colorado when:

The protection and advocacy system receives a complaint from or on behalf of a member receiving services; and

The person does not have a legal guardian or the state or the designee of the state is the legal guardian of the person; and

To the state department or the state department's designees as deemed necessary by the executive director to fulfill the duties prescribed by this article 6 or article 10 of this title 25.5.

Nothing in this section limits a member receiving services access to the member's records.

Nothing in this section interferes with the protections afforded to a person under the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d, and the federal "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 318, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1708. Performance audits - Colorado local government audit law - public disclosure of board administration and operations.

The state auditor may conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit that includes each case management agency or each entity that receives more than seventy-five percent of its funding on an annual basis from the federal, the state, or a local government or from any combination of governmental entities to determine whether the board of directors or the governing body is effectively and efficiently fulfilling its statutory obligations. A case management agency or an entity becomes subject to the audit requirement under this subsection (1) at the time the case management agency or the entity initially satisfies the seventy-five percent funding requirement for any one year regardless of whether or not the funding level decreases below seventy-five percent in any subsequent year. The state auditor shall submit a written report and recommendations on each audit conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) and shall present the report and recommendations to the legislative audit committee created in section 2-3-101 (1). The state auditor shall pay the costs of any performance audit conducted pursuant to this section.

Each case management agency and each entity is subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29.

In connection with the board of directors or the governing body of each case management agency or each entity, in addition to any other requirements applicable to the operation of the board of directors or the governing body pursuant to this section or as required elsewhere by law:

The case management agency or the entity shall post the date, time, and location of each regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors or the governing body on the website of the case management agency or the entity not less than fourteen business days before the meeting. The case management agency or the entity shall post the date, time, and location of any special or emergency meeting of the board of directors or the governing body on the website of the case management agency or the entity not less than twenty-four hours before the meeting.

Each case management agency or each entity shall post the agenda for each meeting of the board of directors or the governing body on the website of the case management agency or the entity not less than seven business days before the meeting. The case management agency or the entity shall post the agenda of any special or emergency meeting of the board of directors or the governing body on the website of the case management agency or the entity not less than twenty-four hours before the meeting. Each meeting of the board of directors or the governing body must allow for public comment, and the agenda must reflect this requirement. Public comment must be reasonably permitted during the board's or the governing body's meeting to accommodate community needs. Any documents related to functions of the case management agency or the entity to be distributed at a meeting of the board of directors or the governing body that are available for public dissemination at the time the agenda is posted must also be posted on the website of the case management agency or the entity at the time the agenda is posted. Written copies of the documents must be made available for public dissemination at the board of directors' or the governing body's meeting; except that the posting requirement specified in this subsection (3)(b) does not apply to any document, or any portion of a document, the disclosure of which requires the approval of the board of directors or the governing body and which approval has not been obtained at the time the agenda is posted or any other document, or any portion of a document, containing any information that is legally prohibited from being disclosed to the public pursuant to the privacy requirements specified in the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d, any document that has been or will be discussed by the board of directors or the governing body meeting in executive session, or any other document the disclosure of which is otherwise prohibited by law.

Each case management agency and each entity shall provide a direct e-mail address to each member of the board of directors or the governing body on the website of the case management agency or the entity. The e-mail address selected must specify the name of the individual board or governing body member and make reference to the particular case management agency or entity for which the board or governing body member serves as a member of the board of directors or the governing body. An e-mail that is sent to a member of the board of directors or the governing body of a case management agency or an entity must not be filtered by the case management agency or the entity through an employee of the case management agency or the entity before it is sent to the board or governing body member.

The board of directors or the governing body of each case management agency or each entity shall present the financial statements of the organization for the approval of the board of directors or the governing body at each regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors or the governing body. The financial statements must reflect accurate and current financial information and be prepared using generally accepted accounting principles. Where exigent circumstances are present that materially affect the preparation of the financial statements on a monthly basis, the statements may be presented for the approval of the board of directors or the governing body at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors or the governing body but not less than at least once each quarter of the calendar year.

Each case management agency and each entity shall require the person or organization that performs financial audits of the case management agency or the entity to present and discuss the results of the audit to the board of directors or the governing body not less than once each year at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors or the governing body;

Each case management agency and each entity shall provide to the incoming members of the board of directors or the governing body training in such topics as the duties of a board or governing body member, the financial and fiduciary responsibilities assumed by board or governing body members, the intellectual and developmental disability and long-term services and supports system in the state, the overall business functions of the case management agency or the entity, and any other matters that will, in the determination of the case management agency or the entity, allow the board or governing body member to better understand and fulfill the board or governing body member's obligations to the board of directors or the governing body and the case management agency or the entity and the role played by the case management agency or the entity in the state in connection with the delivery of services for members receiving services pursuant to this article 6 and article 10 of this title 25.5; and

Each case management agency and each entity shall post on the website of the case management agency or the entity the minutes of each meeting of its board of directors or its governing body as the minutes are approved by the board of directors or the governing body. Each case management agency and each entity shall also post on the website of the case management agency or the entity any additional documents that were distributed to the board or governing body at the meeting that were not, as of that date, already posted on the website of the case management agency or the entity unless the public distribution of the documents, or any portion of the documents, is otherwise prohibited pursuant to the privacy requirements specified in the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d, or as otherwise prohibited by law. Minutes of special meetings of the board of directors or the governing body must be posted on the website of the case management agency or the entity after approval by the board of directors or the governing body at the board's or governing body's next regular meeting.

With respect to financial information concerning the case management agency or the entity, each case management agency or each entity shall:

Post the following on the website of the case management agency or the entity in a place that allows access to the public in a clear, accessible, easily operated, and uncomplicated manner:

Each completed financial audit undertaken of the case management agency or the entity not later than thirty days following acceptance by the organization's board of directors or governing body of the audit. Any case management agency or any entity that is not required to have an annual audit of financial statements shall post a detailed account of the agency's or entity's assets, liabilities, revenue, losses and gains, expenses, investing activities, property and equipment, and any other relevant financial disclosures required by the state department.

The most current form 990 the case management agency or the entity has filed with the federal internal revenue service not later than thirty days following filing of the form with the federal internal revenue service. Any case management agency or any entity that is not required to prepare and file a form 990 shall disclose and post the for-profit equivalent federal internal revenue services tax form that includes the total number of individuals employed, all executive-level employee salaries and other compensation, and employee benefits, as required by the state department.

Make the following information available upon reasonable request not later than five business days after the request is made:

The annual budget of the case management agency or the entity for each calendar or fiscal year, as applicable, not later than thirty days after final approval of the budget by the board of directors or the governing body of the case management agency or the entity;

An annual summary of all revenues and expenditures of the case management agency or the entity that have been appropriated by the state department that is calculated by September 30 of each year for the prior year, as applicable; and

A description of the policies and procedures the case management agency or the entity follows to track, manage, and report its financial resources and transactions, which policies and procedures are also known and may be referred to as its "financial controls".

Any contract that each case management agency or each entity enters into with either the state department or the department of human services, created in section 26-1-105, must be posted on the website of the case management agency or the entity in a place that allows access to the public in a clear, accessible, easily operated, and uncomplicated manner not later than thirty days following approval of the contract by the board of directors or the governing body of the case management agency or the entity.

This section does not apply to a county agency, including a county department of human or social services, a county nursing service, an area agency on aging, or a multicounty agency acting as a case management agency that already has existing or duplicative audit and transparency requirements.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 319, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-6-1709. Community-centered board designation - rules.

The state department shall develop a process to designate local or regional organizations as community-centered boards. The state department shall promulgate rules outlining the designation process no later than July 1, 2024. Any contracts or agreements entered into pursuant to this section are exempt from the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 323, § 1, effective September 7.